Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB605.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 61 of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER HEARNED COMPLIANCE CREDITSec.6191. Definitions.6192. Earned compliance credits.§ 6191. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Agency." The department or any regional, local or county governmental agency responsible for supervising individuals placed on probation by the courts or serving a period of parole or postrelease supervision from prison or jail, provided such agencies receive funding from the Commonwealth."Case plan." An individualized accountability and behavior change strategy for supervised individuals that:(1) Targets and prioritizes the specific criminal risk factors of the offender.(2) Matches programs to the offender's individual characteristics such as gender, culture, motivational state, developmental stage and learning style.(3) Establishes a timetable for achieving specific behavioral goals, including a schedule for payment of victim restitution, child support and other financial obligations.(4) Specifies positive and negative actions that will be taken in response to the supervised individual's behaviors."Compliance credit." A period of 15 days for every month that a supervised individual:(1) Fulfills the terms of the supervised individual's case plan.(2) Has no new arrests.(3) Makes scheduled monthly payments for restitution, fines and fees."Supervised individual." An individual placed on probation by the courts or serving a period of parole or postrelease supervision from prison or jail.§ 6192. Earned compliance credits.(a) Agency action.--The agency shall:(1) Award earned compliance credits to a supervised 20250HB0605PN0613 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual who satisfies the requirements specified in the supervised individual's case plan.(2) Place a supervised individual in a nonactive supervision status for the number of days earned as compliance credits.(3) For supervised individuals in nonactive supervision, submit a petition to the court or releasing authority to request that the period of supervision be reduced by the number of days of compliance credits earned by the individual, when the supervised individual has no outstanding restitution, fines or fees and is compliant on the individual's court-ordered payment plan.(4) Adopt rules and regulations, which shall be published on all publicly accessible county Internet websites, for the forfeiture of earned compliance credits for supervised individuals who violate conditions of supervision. The regulations shall provide that:(i) Forfeiture is part of the agency's system of graduated sanctions.(ii) The extent of earned compliance credits forfeited is related to the level of severity of the violation.(iii) Forfeiture of earned compliance credits is limited to credits already earned and may not prospectively deny future earned compliance credits.(iv) A procedure is established for the restoration of forfeited earned compliance credits based on the supervised individual's compliance with supervision conditions and progress in achieving the goals of the supervised individual's case plan.20250HB0605PN0613 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Compliance.--An individual defaulting on the payment of court costs, restitution or fines after imposition of a sentence, who is determined by the court to lack financial means to pay the costs, restitution or fines without causing undue burden to the individual or the individual's family, may not be prohibited from earning or being awarded earned compliance credits so long as the individual is compliant with all other requirements for eligibility under this subchapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0605PN0613 - 4 - 123456789